Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.385

Personalized license plates.

"Personalized license plates" means license plates that display the license plate number assigned to the vehicle or camper for which the license plate number was issued in a combination of letters or numbers, or both, requested by the owner of the vehicle or camper in accordance with chapter 46.18 RCW.

[ 2010 c 161 s 131.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.